Utah statutes.
77-41-111.   Fees.

(1)  Each offender required to register under Section 77-41-105 shall, in the month of the offender's birth:

(a)  pay to the department an annual fee of $100 each year the offender is subject to the registration requirements of this chapter; and

(b)  pay to the registering agency, if it is an agency other than the Department of Corrections, an annual fee of not more than $25, which may be assessed by that agency for providing registration.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), an offender who is confined in a secure facility or in a state mental hospital is not required to pay the annual fee.

(3)  The department shall deposit fees collected in accordance with this chapter in the General Fund as a dedicated credit, to be used by the department for maintaining the offender registry under this chapter and monitoring offender registration compliance, including the costs of:

(a)  data entry;

(b)  processing registration packets;

(c)  updating registry information;

(d)  ensuring offender compliance with registration requirements under this chapter; and

(e)  apprehending offenders who are in violation of the offender registration requirements under this chapter.

